src/adj-eng-lex.txt
LEXICON adjlong
+A: # ;

LEXICON adj
+A: # ;
+A+Comp:%>er # ;
+A+Superl:%>est # ;

LEXICON Adjective
Dallas-based adj ;
Greek-born adj ;
Philco-sponsored adj ;
Western adj ;
25-year-old adj ;
67-year-old adj ;
above-ground adj ;
abysmal adj ;
acrobatic adj ;
adhesive adj ;
adventurous adj ;
afire adj ;
agreed-upon adj ;
alive adj ;
all-purpose adj ;
alma adj ;
ambitious adj ;
analeptic adj ;
angry adj ;
anterior adj ;
anti-assignment adj ;
antic adj ;
anxious adj ;
apt adj ;
aristocratic adj ;
ascertainable adj ;
asymmetric adj ;
atune adj ;
autocratic adj ;
aware adj ;
backwoods adj ;
barbaric adj ;
beat-up adj ;
bewhiskered adj ;
bilinear adj ;
birdlike adj ;
blood-bought adj ;
bomb-proof adj ;
brainy adj ;
broke adj ;
builder/active adj ;
by-passing adj ;
carboxy-labeled adj ;
cave-like adj ;
chatty adj ;
chronological adj ;
clean-top adj ;
coexistent adj ;
combatant adj ;
complaisant adj ;
confidential adj ;
constant adj ;
conversant adj ;
cosmopolitan adj ;
crazy adj ;
cruel adj ;
cypress-like adj ;
dead adj ;
defensible adj ;
deplorable adj ;
diabetic adj ;
dimly-outlined adj ;
dismal adj ;
do-good adj ;
downtalking adj ;
drunk adj ;
early-morning adj ;
eerie adj ;
elephantine adj ;
enjoyable adj ;
erratic adj ;
every-day adj ;
expendable adj ;
extravagant adj ;
false adj ;
fast-opening adj ;
felicitous adj ;
fifty-cent adj ;
first-rate adj ;
floral adj ;
force-fear adj ;
fractious adj ;
frivolous adj ;
fundamentalist adj ;
gaudy adj ;
giddy adj ;
goddamn adj ;
grandiloquent adj ;
green-tinted adj ;
gum-chewing adj ;
half-melted adj ;
handmade adj ;
haute adj ;
hectic adj ;
high-level adj ;
home-grown adj ;
hot-honey adj ;
hypoactive adj ;
ill-starred adj ;
impartial adj ;
impressive adj ;
incessant adj ;
indecent adj ;
indomitable adj ;
infectious adj ;
injurious adj ;
instructional adj ;
intercollegiate adj ;
interesting adjlong ;
interstage adj ;
inventive adj ;
iodide-concentrating adjlong ;
irresolvable adj ;
jocose adj ;
kinesthetic adj ;
knot-tying adjlong ;
labor-saving adjlong ;
largely-silent adj ;
law-abiding adjlong ;
legendary adj ;
legislation-delaying adjlong ;
lidless adj ;
life-supporting adjlong ;
light-reflecting adjlong ;
light-transmitting adjlong ;
limp-looking adjlong ;
literal adj ;
long-acting adjlong ;
long-keeping adjlong ;
long-overdue adj ;
longstanding adjlong ;
longsuffering adjlong ;
low-boiling adjlong ;
low-cost adj ;
low-flying adjlong ;
low-lying adjlong ;
low-sudsing adjlong ;
lyrical adj ;
magic-practicing adjlong ;
managerial adj ;
mass-building adjlong ;
material adj ;
materials-handling adjlong ;
medieval adj ;
metal-cleaning adjlong ;
metal-tasting adjlong ;
metal-working adjlong ;
metallic adj ;
mild-mannered adj ;
modal adj ;
money-making adjlong ;
money-saving adjlong ;
monotone adj ;
morale-enhancing adjlong ;
mosquito-plagued adj ;
mouth-watering adjlong ;
muddy-tasting adjlong ;
multiple adj ;
muscle-shaping adjlong ;
music-loving adjlong ;
narrow-minded adj ;
nation-building adjlong ;
necrotic adj ;
nerve-shattering adjlong ;
new-rich adj ;
newly-emerging adjlong ;
nice-looking adjlong ;
no-driving adjlong ;
no-trading adjlong ;
noiseless adj ;
non-bearing adjlong ;
non-forthcoming adjlong ;
non-freezing adjlong ;
non-partisan adj ;
non-propagating adjlong ;
nonfunctional adj ;
northwest adj ;
nutritional adj ;
oath-taking adjlong ;
ocean-going adjlong ;
oceanographic adj ;
oil-bearing adjlong ;
oleophilic adj ;
oncoming adjlong ;
onward-driving adjlong ;
open-collared adj ;
oriental adj ;
out-reaching adjlong ;
outer adj ;
outgoing adjlong ;
outstanding adjlong ;
overbearing adjlong ;
overhand adj ;
pains-taking adjlong ;
painstaking adjlong ;
panic adj ;
part-time adj ;
particularistic-seeming adjlong ;
patent-sharing adjlong ;
peace-loving adjlong ;
pearly adj ;
peridontal adj ;
phenomenal adj ;
photon-counting adjlong ;
piezoelectric adj ;
pistol-packing adjlong ;
playable adj ;
policy-making adjlong ;
polyether-type adj ;
post-war adj ;
poultry-loving adjlong ;
pre-conscious adj ;
pre-empting adjlong ;
preferable adj ;
pressure-measuring adjlong ;
pressure-sensing adjlong ;
preventive adj ;
prize-winning adjlong ;
problem-solving adjlong ;
problematic adj ;
profit-maximizing adjlong ;
profit-sharing adjlong ;
prosperous adj ;
psychopathic adj ;
pulse-timing adjlong ;
pyramidal adj ;
quick-drying adjlong ;
quick-handling adjlong ;
radial adj ;
rapidly-diminishing adjlong ;
rational adj ;
rear-looking adjlong ;
record-tying adjlong ;
recovery adj ;
reflectance-measuring adjlong ;
regulative adj ;
relationship-building adjlong ;
reproducible adj ;
resultant adj ;
revenge-seeking adjlong ;
riotous adj ;
rip-roaring adjlong ;
rough-tough adj ;
run-scoring adjlong ;
rusty adj ;
sales-building adjlong ;
sanitaire adj ;
school-leaving adjlong ;
schoolgirlish adj ;
scimitar-wielding adjlong ;
seafaring adjlong ;
sedimentary adj ;
seed-bearing adjlong ;
self-consuming adjlong ;
self-correcting adjlong ;
self-deceiving adjlong ;
self-defeating adjlong ;
self-effacing adjlong ;
self-energizing adjlong ;
self-extinguishing adjlong ;
self-judging adjlong ;
self-locking adjlong ;
self-pitying adjlong ;
self-sacrificing adjlong ;
self-seeking adjlong ;
self-styled adj ;
self-sustaining adjlong ;
self-unloading adjlong ;
selfeffacing adjlong ;
semisecret adj ;
severe-looking adjlong ;
shade-darkened adj ;
short-run adj ;
side-looking adjlong ;
sight-seeing adjlong ;
silvery adj ;
simple-seeming adjlong ;
skinny adj ;
sky-carving adjlong ;
sky-reaching adjlong ;
sky-tapping adjlong ;
slightly-smoking adjlong ;
slow-acting adjlong ;
slow-bouncing adjlong ;
slow-firing adjlong ;
slow-growing adjlong ;
slow-moving adjlong ;
slow-scrambling adjlong ;
slowly-mending adjlong ;
smoke-filled adj ;
snug-fitting adjlong ;
social-climbing adjlong ;
socio-political adj ;
soft-looking adjlong ;
soil-bearing adjlong ;
sopping adjlong ;
sordid adj ;
soul-searching adjlong ;
spear-throwing adjlong ;
spectrometric adj ;
spell-binding adjlong ;
spine-chilling adjlong ;
spleen-crushing adjlong ;
square-built adj ;
squashed-looking adjlong ;
stabilizing-conserving adjlong ;
staunch adj ;
sterling adjlong ;
still-building adjlong ;
stirling adjlong ;
stony adj ;
strange-sounding adjlong ;
strapping adjlong ;
striking adjlong ;
stupendous adj ;
sub-freezing adjlong ;
subsurface adj ;
succeeding adjlong ;
sucker-rolling adjlong ;
sunshiny adj ;
surface-declaring adjlong ;
surgical adj ;
sweet-smelling adjlong ;
sweet-sounding adjlong ;
swift-striding adjlong ;
swollen adj ;
swollen-looking adjlong ;
symbolic-sounding adjlong ;
talky adj ;
tall-growing adjlong ;
target-hunting adjlong ;
tax-paying adjlong ;
tea-drinking adjlong ;
telegraphic adj ;
testimonial adj ;
textile-exporting adjlong ;
textile-importing adjlong ;
textile-producing adjlong ;
thorough adj ;
thoroughgoing adjlong ;
thyroid-stimulating adjlong ;
thyroxine-binding adjlong ;
time-consuming adjlong ;
tintable adj ;
top-ranking adjlong ;
topmost adj ;
torso-defining adjlong ;
tough-looking adjlong ;
transcultural adj ;
trend-following adjlong ;
trivial adj ;
truth-revealing adjlong ;
tsunami-warning adjlong ;
two-fisted adj ;
two-timing adjlong ;
unachievable adj ;
unauthorized adj ;
uncomfortable adj ;
undercover adj ;
undreamed adj ;
unfelt adj ;
unfitting adjlong ;
unheated adj ;
uninteresting adjlong ;
unique-ingrown-screwedup adj ;
unmarried adj ;
unpaved adj ;
unrealistic adj ;
unseemly adj ;
unsmiling adjlong ;
unstaring adjlong ;
unstuffy adj ;
unwarranted adj ;
unwilling adjlong ;
up-and-coming adjlong ;
up-jutting adjlong ;
upstanding adjlong ;
urinary adj ;
velvety adj ;
vertical-takeoff-and-landing adjlong ;
vindictive adj ;
voluminous adj ;
wage-earning adjlong ;
warmongering adjlong ;
warty adj ;
water-holding adjlong ;
wave-setting adjlong ;
weird adj ;
well-meaning adjlong ;
well-played adj ;
white-topped adj ;
wide-ranging adjlong ;
wide-sweeping adjlong ;
wild-sounding adjlong ;
willing adjlong ;
wintry adj ;
wonder-working adjlong ;
world-ignoring adjlong ;
world-renowned adj ;
world-shaking adjlong ;
world-shattering adjlong ;
year-long adj ;
